District of Columbia statutes.
9-810

Penalty.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Administrator under this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a fine of not more than $500 or to imprisonment not exceeding 6 months, or to both such fine and imprisonment.

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 772, ch. 905, § 10
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1210.
1973 Ed., § 7-1410.

Prior Codifications